Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-237
Attendance; application;
cancellation; forms.

(1) For a student to begin
attendance as an option student in an option school district which is not
in a learning community in which the student resides, the student's parent
or legal guardian shall submit an application to the school board of the option
school district between September 1 and March 15 for attendance during the
following and subsequent school years. Except as provided in subsection (2) of
this section, applications submitted after March 15 shall contain
a release approval from the resident school district on the application form
prescribed and furnished by the State Department of Education pursuant to
subsection (8) of this section. A district
may not accept or approve any applications submitted after such date without
such a release approval. The option school district shall provide the resident
school district with the name of the applicant on or before April 1 or, in
the case of an application submitted after March 15, within sixty days after
submission. The option school district shall notify, in writing, the parent
or legal guardian of the student and the resident school district whether
the application is accepted or rejected on or before April 1 or, in the case
of an application submitted after March 15, within sixty days after submission.

(2) A student
who relocates to a different resident school district after February 1, whose
option school district merges with another district effective after February
1, or whose qualification for the option for school year 2013-14 is changed
pursuant to the changes made to subsection (1) of section 79-234 by Laws 2013,
LB410, may submit an application to the school board of an option school district
for attendance during the immediately following and subsequent school years.
Such application does not require the release approval of the resident school
district. The option school district shall accept or reject such application
within forty-five days.

(3) For
a student who resides in a learning community to begin attendance in an option
school district which is a member of such learning community, the student's
parent or legal guardian shall submit an application to the school board of
the option school district (a) for any learning community established prior
to February 13, 2009, between February 13, 2009, and April 1, 2009, or (b)
for any learning community established thereafter, between September 1 and
March 15. Applications submitted after such deadlines shall be accompanied
by a written release from the resident school district. Students who reside
in a learning community shall only begin attendance in an option school district
which is a member of such learning community prior to the end of the first
full school year for which the option school district is a member of such
learning community. The option school district shall provide the resident
school district with the name of the applicant within five days after the
applicable deadline. The option school district shall notify, in writing,
the parent or legal guardian of the student and the resident school district whether
the application is accepted or rejected on or before April 1. A parent or guardian may
provide information on the application regarding the applicant's potential
qualification for free or reduced-price lunches. Any such information provided
shall be subject to verification and shall only be used for the purposes of
subsection (4) of section 79-238. Nothing in this subsection requires a parent
or guardian to provide such information. Determinations about an applicant's
qualification for free or reduced-price lunches for purposes of subsection
(4) of section 79-238 shall be based on any verified information provided
on the application. If no such information is provided, the student shall
be presumed not to qualify for free or reduced-price lunches for the purposes
of subsection (4) of section 79-238.

(4) Applications for students
who do not actually attend the option school district may be withdrawn in
good standing upon mutual agreement by both the resident and option school
districts.

(5) No option student shall
attend an option school district for less than one school year unless the
student relocates to a different resident school district, completes requirements
for graduation prior to the end of his or her senior year, transfers to a
private or parochial school, or upon mutual agreement of the resident and
option school districts cancels the enrollment option and returns to the resident
school district.

(6) Except as provided in
subsection (5) of this section, the option
student shall attend the option school district until graduation unless the
student relocates in a different resident school district, transfers to a
private or parochial school, or chooses to return to the resident school district.

(7) In each case of cancellation
pursuant to subsections (5) and (6) of
this section, the student's parent or legal guardian shall provide written
notification to the school board of the option school district and the
resident school district on forms prescribed and furnished by the department
under subsection (8) of this section in advance
of such cancellation.

(8) The application and cancellation
forms shall be prescribed and furnished by the State Department of Education.

(9) An option student who
subsequently chooses to attend a private or parochial school shall be automatically
accepted to return to either the resident school district or option school
district upon the completion of the grade levels offered at the private or
parochial school. If such student chooses to return to the option school district,
the student's parent or legal guardian shall submit another application to
the school board of the option school district which shall be automatically
accepted, and the deadlines prescribed in this section shall be waived.

Laws 1989, LB 183, § 6;

Laws 1990, LB 843, § 7;

Laws 1993, LB 348, § 66;

Laws 1993, LB 838, § 1;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-3406;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 41;

Laws 2001, LB 797, § 6;

Laws 2006, LB 1024, § 19;

Laws 2009, LB62, § 2;

Laws 2009, LB549, § 6;

Laws 2013, LB410, § 4.